District of Columbia statutes.
3-3501

Expired

Establishment of advisory task force on men.

Expired.

Feb. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-72, § 2, 40 DCR 7585
1981 Ed., § 2-3901.

Expiration of Law 10-72

Section 8(b) of D.C. Law 10-72 provided that the act shall expire 3 years after its effective date.